District of Columbia statutes.
31-1903

Confidentiality.

All financial analysis ratios and examination synopses and related information concerning insurance companies that are submitted to the Mayor by the NAIC Insurance Regulatory Information System are confidential and may not be disclosed by the Mayor or any member of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking. This information shall not be subject to disclosure under the District of Columbia Freedom of Information Act or any other District law relating to disclosure of information.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-42, § 4, 40 DCR 6020
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(dd), 44 DCR 1730
June 11, 2004, D.C. Law 15-166, § 4(k), 51 DCR 2817

History

1981 Ed., § 35-3403.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 15-166 substituted “Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking” for “Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation”.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(k) of Consolidation of Financial Services Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-381, February 27, 2004, 51 DCR 2653).

Emergency Legislation

The “District of Columbia Freedom of Information Act,” referred to in this section, is D.C. Law 1-96, codified at § 2-531 et seq.

References in Text